New Jersey, session 221, A3433.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Hazardous weather means a thunderstorm, gusting or sustained wind, rain, or any other hazardous weather condition. Inflatable ride or ride means an air-supported inflatable structure that incorporates a structural and mechanical system, employs a high strength fabric or film that achieves its strength, shape, and stability by tensioning from internal air pressure, and is intended for riders to bounce, ride, slide, or be supported after entering or mounting it. Manual means a manual, instruction book, guidance, or other design and operation document prepared by the manufacturer of an inflatable ride. Operator means the operator of an inflatable ride. 2.    Every inflatable ride shall have an identification and data plate attached, glued, or sewn to it. The identification and data plate shall include the following information: a.     the manufacturers name and address; b.    the date of manufacture; c.     the ride name and ride serial number; d.    rider capacity, by weight and number; e.     cubic feet per minute required to properly inflate the ride and the type of blower to be used; and f.     any other requirements as determined by the Commissioner of Community Affairs. 3.    An inflatable ride manufacturer shall proscribe the requirements related to the rides operation, maintenance, and set-up in a manual provided to an operator.  The manual shall contain illustrations and clear, detailed instructions for setting up and safely operating an inflatable ride, including tie-down and anchorage requirements.  A manufacturer also shall indicate in the manual safe operation and usage requirements for each inflatable ride, including information on avoidance of imminent danger, rider conduct, and cleanliness. 4.    a.   A manufacturer shall include one set of ground anchors with each inflatable ride.  The size and number of anchorage points shall be adequate for the structure and take into account live and wind loads. b.    An operator shall perform a thorough check of the inflatable ride and its accessories to ensure that all anchor points, anchor ropes, and anchor stakes or ballasts are undamaged and suitable before use. c.     An operator shall ensure that all tie-down ropes attached to the inflatable ride are fastened to a stake or anchorage. An operator shall replace any rope that becomes detached from the structure with ropes of at least equivalent breaking strength, and attached with equivalent or greater attachment strength. An operator shall use anchors that are straight stakes, screw stakes, ground weights, or sandbag ground anchors, and shall not use any anchor that is not specifically described within the manual. An operator may use substitutions if allowed and as indicated in the manual.  An operator shall ensure that anchors are protected to prevent any public hazard. An operator shall use stakes or ballast at every anchorage point, which shall be installed pursuant to manufacturer requirements.  An operator shall use stakes with restraining hooks or collars at the top to prevent the attached rope from sliding up and releasing. Ground stakes shall be a minimum of 40 inches long for slides 15 feet or higher. 5.    a.   An operator shall evacuate all riders and deflate the inflatable ride in the event of any approaching hazardous weather related condition.  After the weather condition passes, the operator shall dry the inflatable ride of rainwater, and re-inflate and re-inspect the inflatable ride.  Riders shall be readmitted only when the inflatable ride is deemed safe to operate. b.    An operator shall not operate an inflatable ride if the wind velocity exceeds the manufacturers recommended maximum safe operating wind speed. 6.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall adopt rules and regulations, including requirements related to inspection and testing of inflatable rides, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to effectuate the purposes of this act. 7.    This act shall take effect 1[immediately] on the first day of the seventh month after enactment, except that the Commissioner of Community Affairs may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act1.